California statutes. Water Code
The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Improperly constructed and abandoned water wells, cathodic protection wells, groundwater monitoring wells, and geothermal heat exchange wells can allow contaminated water on the surface to flow down the well casing, thereby contaminating the usable groundwater.

(b) Improperly constructed and abandoned water wells, cathodic protection wells, groundwater monitoring wells, and geothermal heat exchange wells can allow unusable or low quality groundwater from one groundwater level to flow along the well casing to usable groundwater levels, thereby contaminating the usable groundwater.

(c) Contamination of groundwater poses serious public health and economic problems for many areas of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 581, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [13710. - 13713.]

13710.

“Well” or “water well” as used in this chapter, means any artificial excavation constructed by any method for the purpose of extracting water from, or injecting water into, the underground. This definition shall not include: (a) oil and gas wells, or geothermal wells constructed under the jurisdiction of the Department of Conservation, except those wells converted to use as water wells; or (b) wells used for the purpose of (1) dewatering excavation during construction, or (2) stabilizing hillsides or earth embankments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13711.

“Cathodic protection well,” as used in this chapter, means any artificial excavation in excess of 50 feet constructed by any method for the purpose of installing equipment or facilities for the protection electrically of metallic equipment in contact with the ground, commonly referred to as cathodic protection.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13712.

“Monitoring well” as used in this chapter, means any artificial excavation by any method for the purpose of monitoring fluctuations in groundwater levels, quality of underground waters, or the concentration of contaminants in underground waters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1373, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13712.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13712, all wells constructed for the purpose of monitoring the presence of groundwater which has adversely affected, or threatens to adversely affect, crop root zones are exempt from the reporting requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13713.

“Geothermal heat exchange well,” as used in this chapter, means any uncased artificial excavation, by any method, that uses the heat exchange capacity of the earth for heating and cooling, in which excavation the ambient ground temperature is 30 degrees Celsius (86 degrees Fahrenheit) or less, and which excavation uses a closed loop fluid system to prevent the discharge or escape of its fluid into surrounding aquifers or other geologic formations. Geothermal heat exchange wells include ground source heat pump wells.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 581, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reports [13750.5. - 13755.]

13750.5.

No person shall undertake to dig, bore, or drill a water well, cathodic protection well, groundwater monitoring well, or geothermal heat exchange well, to deepen or reperforate such a well, or to abandon or destroy such a well, unless the person responsible for that construction, alteration, destruction, or abandonment possesses a C-57 Water Well Contractor’s License.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 581, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13751.

(a) Every person who digs, bores, or drills a water well, cathodic protection well, groundwater monitoring well, or geothermal heat exchange well, abandons or destroys such a well, or deepens or reperforates such a well, shall file with the department a report of completion of that well within 60 days from the date its construction, alteration, abandonment, or destruction is completed.

(b) The report shall be made on forms furnished by the department and shall contain information as follows:

(1) In the case of a water well, cathodic protection well, or groundwater monitoring well, the report shall contain information as required by the department, including, but not limited to all of the following information:

(A) A description of the well site sufficiently exact to permit location and identification of the well.

(B) A detailed log of the well.

(C) A description of type of construction.

(D) The details of perforation.

(E) The methods used for sealing off surface or contaminated waters.

(F) The methods used for preventing contaminated waters of one aquifer from mixing with the waters of another aquifer.

(G) The signature of the well driller.

(2) In the case of a geothermal heat exchange well, the report shall contain all of the following information:

(A) A description of the site that is sufficiently exact to permit the location and identification of the site and the number of geothermal heat exchange wells drilled on the same lot.

(B) A description of borehole diameter and depth and the type of geothermal heat exchange system installed.

(C) The methods and materials used to seal off surface or contaminated waters.

(D) The methods used for preventing contaminated water in one aquifer from mixing with the water in another aquifer.

(E) The signature of the well driller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 581, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13752.

(a) Reports made in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 13751 shall be made available as follows:

(1) To governmental agencies.

(2) To the public, upon request, in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The department may charge a fee for the provision of a report pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) that does not exceed the reasonable costs to the department of providing the report, including costs of promulgating any regulations to implement this section.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code, the disclosure of a report in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) in the possession of the department or another governmental agency shall comply with the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 42.   (SB 83)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13753.

Every person who hereafter converts, for use as a water well, cathodic protection well, or monitoring well, any oil or gas well originally constructed under the jurisdiction of the Department of Conservation pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Public Resources Code, shall comply with all provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1373, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13754.

Failure to comply with any provision of this article, or willful and deliberate falsification of any report required by this article, is a misdemeanor.

Before commencing prosecution against any person, other than for willful and deliberate falsification of any report required by this article, the person shall be given reasonable opportunity to comply with the provisions of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13755.

This chapter does not affect the powers and duties of the State Department of Public Health with respect to water and water systems pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116270) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. Every person shall comply with this chapter and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, in addition to standards adopted by any city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 52.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Quality Control [13800. - 13806.]

13800.

The department, after the studies and investigations pursuant to Section 231 as it finds necessary, on determining that water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction standards are needed in an area to protect the quality of water used or that may be used for any beneficial use, shall so report to the appropriate regional water quality control board and to the State Department of Public Health. The report shall contain the recommended standards for water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction as, in the department’s opinion, are necessary to protect the quality of any affected water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 53.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13800.5.

(a) (1) The department shall develop recommended standards for the construction, maintenance, abandonment, or destruction of geothermal heat exchange wells.

(2) Until the department develops recommended standards pursuant to paragraph (1), a local enforcement agency with authority over geothermal heat exchange wells may adopt temporary regulations applicable to geothermal heat exchange wells that the local enforcement agency determines to be consistent with the intent of existing department standards to prevent wells from becoming conduits of contamination.

(3) The department, not later than July 1, 1997, shall submit to the state board a report containing the recommended geothermal heat exchange well standards.

(b) The state board, not later than January 1, 1998, shall adopt a model geothermal heat exchange well ordinance that implements the recommended standards developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a). The state board shall circulate the model ordinance to all cities and counties.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each county, city, or water agency, where appropriate, not later than April 1, 1998, shall adopt a geothermal heat exchange well ordinance that meets or exceeds the recommended standards developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a). If a water agency that has permit authority over well drilling adopts a geothermal heat exchange well ordinance that meets or exceeds the recommended standards developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), a county or city shall not be required to adopt an ordinance for the same area.

(d) If a county, city, or water agency, where appropriate, fails to adopt an ordinance that establishes geothermal heat exchange well standards, the model ordinance adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (b) shall take effect on May 1, 1998, and shall be enforced by the county or city and have the same force and effect as if adopted as a county or city ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 581, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13801.

(a) The regional board, upon receipt of a report from the department pursuant to Section 13800, shall hold a public hearing on the need to establish well standards for the area involved. The regional board may hold a public hearing with respect to any area regardless of whether a report has been received from the department if it has information that standards may be needed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the state board shall, not later than September 1, 1989, adopt a model water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well drilling and abandonment ordinance implementing the standards for water well construction, maintenance, and abandonment contained in Bulletin 74-81
 of the department. If the model ordinance is not adopted by this date, the state board shall report to the Legislature as to the reasons for the delay. The state board shall circulate the model ordinances to all cities and counties.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, each county, city, or water agency, where appropriate, shall, not later than January 15, 1990, adopt a water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well drilling and abandonment ordinance that meets or exceeds the standards contained in Bulletin 74-81. Where a water agency that has permit authority over well drilling within the agency adopts a water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well drilling and abandonment ordinance that meets or exceeds the standards contained in Bulletin 74-81, a county or city shall not be required to adopt an ordinance for the same area.

(d) If a county, city, or water
 agency, where appropriate, fails to adopt an ordinance establishing water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well drilling and abandonment standards, the model ordinance adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (b) shall take effect on February 15, 1990, and shall be enforced by the county or city and have the same force and effect as if adopted as a county or city ordinance.

(e) The minimum standards recommended by the department and adopted by the state board or local agencies for the construction, maintenance, abandonment, or destruction of monitoring wells or class 1 hazardous injection wells shall not be construed to limit, abridge, or supersede the powers or duties of the State Department of Public Health in their application of standards to the construction, maintenance, abandonment, or destruction of monitoring wells or class 1 hazardous injection wells at facilities that treat, store, or dispose of hazardous waste
 or at any site where the State Department of Public Health is the lead agency responsible for investigation and remedial action at that site, as long as the standards used by the State Department of Public Health meet or exceed those in effect by any city, county, or water agency where appropriate, responsible for developing ordinances for the area in question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 54.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13802.

If the regional board finds that standards of water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction are needed in any area to protect the quality of water used, or which may be used, for any beneficial use, it shall determine the area to be involved and so report to each affected county and city in the area. The report shall also contain any well standards which have been recommended by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1373, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13803.

Each such affected county and city shall, within 120 days of receipt of the report, adopt an ordinance establishing standards of water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction for the area designated by the regional board. Prior to adoption of the ordinance each affected county and city shall consult with all interested parties, including licensed well drillers. A copy of the ordinance shall be sent to the regional board on its adoption and the regional board shall transmit the ordinance to the department for its review and comments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1373, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

13804.

Such county and city well standards shall take effect 60 days from the date of their adoption by the county or city unless the regional board, on its own motion, or on the request of any affected person, holds a public hearing on the matter and determines that the county or city well standards are not sufficiently restrictive to protect the quality of the affected waters. If the board makes such a determination it shall so report to the affected county or city and also recommend the well standards, or the modification of the county or city well standards, which it determines are necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13805.

If a county or city fails to adopt an ordinance establishing water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction standards within 120 days of receipt of the regional board’s report of its determination and those standards are necessary pursuant to Section 13802, or fails to adopt or modify those well standards in the manner determined as necessary by the regional board pursuant to Section 13804 within 90 days of receipt of the regional board’s report, the regional board shall adopt standards for water well, cathodic protection well, and monitoring well construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction for the area. The regional board well standards shall take effect 30 days from the date of their adoption by the regional board and shall be enforced by the city or county and have the same force and effect as if adopted as a county or city ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1373, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

13806.

Any action, report, or determination taken or adopted by a regional board or any failure of a regional board to act pursuant to this article, or any county or city ordinance in the event of the failure of a regional board to review such ordinance pursuant to Section 13804, may be reviewed by the state board on its own motion, and shall be reviewed by the state board on the request of any affected county or city, in the same manner as other action or inaction of the regional board is reviewed pursuant to Section 13320. The state board has the same powers as to the review of action or inaction of a regional board or of a county or city ordinance under this article as it has as to other action or inaction of a regional board under Section 13320, including being vested with all the powers granted a regional board under this article, with like force and effect if it finds that appropriate action has not been taken by a regional board. Any action of a regional board under this article or any county or city ordinance affected by the review of the state board shall have no force or effect during the period of the review by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.2. California Safe Drinking Water Bond Law of 1984 [13810. - 13845.]

13810.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Safe Drinking Water Bond Law of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13811.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is necessary for the preservation of the health, safety, and welfare of the people of California that water supplied for domestic purposes be pure, wholesome, and potable and does not endanger the health or lives of human beings and that water is available in adequate quantity at sufficient pressure for health, cleanliness, and other domestic purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13812.

The Legislature further finds and declares that a number of domestic water supply systems are inadequate and do not meet minimum bacteriological, chemical, or other basic health standards for domestic water supplies, and that it is in the interest of the people that the State of California provide technical and financial assistance to the end that the people of California are assured a safe, dependable, and potable supply of water for domestic purposes and that water is available in adequate quantity at sufficient pressure for health, cleanliness, and other domestic purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13813.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the intent of the Legislature to provide for the upgrading of domestic water supply systems to assure that all domestic water supplies at least meet minimum domestic water supply standards established under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 433.   Effective September 29, 1996.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, and approved in Prop. 28 on Nov. 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13814.

The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code) is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this chapter, and the provisions of that law are included in this chapter as though set out in full in this chapter, except that notwithstanding anything in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the bonds authorized hereunder shall bear the rates of interest, or maximum rates, as may, from time to time, be fixed by the Treasurer, with the approval of the committee, and the maximum maturity of bonds shall not exceed 50 years from the date of the bonds, or from the date of each respective series. The maturity of each respective series shall be calculated from the date of the series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13815.

As used in this chapter, and for purposes of this chapter as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Safe Drinking Water Finance Committee created by Section 13816.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(c) “Domestic water system” means a system for the provision to the public of piped water for human consumption, if the system has at least 15 service connections or regularly supplies water to at least 25 individuals. The term includes any water supply, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under the control of the operator of the system.

(d) “Fund” means the California Safe Drinking Water Fund.

(e) “Supplier” or “supplier of water” means any person, partnership, corporation, association, or other entity or political subdivision of the state which owns or operates a domestic water system.

(f) “Federal assistance” means funds available, or which may become available, to a supplier either directly or through allocation by the state from the federal government as grants or loans for the improvement of domestic water systems.

(g) “Treatment works” means any devices or systems used in the treatment of water supplies, including necessary lands, which render water supplies pure, wholesome, and potable for domestic purpose.

(h) “Project” means proposed facilities for the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the domestic water system, and may include water supply, treatment works, and all or part of a water distribution system, if necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13816.

The Safe Drinking Water Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee shall consist of the Governor, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the Director of Water Resources, and the State Director of Health Services or their designated representatives. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13817.

There is in the State Treasury the California Safe Drinking Water Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13818.

The committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in an aggregate amount of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) in the manner provided in this chapter. The debt or debts, liability or liabilities, shall be created for the purpose of providing the money to be used for the objects and works specified in Section 13819.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13819.

(a) The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated and shall be used for the purposes set forth in this section.

(b) The department may enter into contracts with suppliers having authority to construct, operate, and maintain domestic water systems, for loans to suppliers to aid in the construction of projects that will enable the supplier to meet, at a minimum, safe drinking water standards established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Any contract entered into pursuant to this section may include provisions as agreed by the parties thereto, and the contract shall include, in substance, all of the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the project.

(2) An agreement by the department to loan to the supplier, during the progress of construction or following completion of construction as agreed by the parties, an amount that equals the portion of construction costs found by the department to be eligible for a state loan.

(3) An agreement by the supplier to repay the state over a period not to exceed 50 years, (A) the amount of the loan, (B) the administrative fee as described in Section 13830, and (C) interest on the principal, that is the amount of the loan plus the administrative fee.

(4) An agreement by the supplier, (A) to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project, (B) to commence operation of the project upon completion thereof, and to properly operate and maintain the project in accordance with the applicable provisions of law, (C) to apply for, and make reasonable efforts, to secure federal assistance for the project, (D) to secure approval of the department and of the State Department of Health Services before applying for federal assistance in order to maximize and best utilize the amounts of that assistance available, and (E) to provide for payment of the supplier’s share of the cost of the project, if any.

(d) Bond proceeds may be used for a grant program in accordance with this chapter, with grants provided to suppliers that are political subdivisions of the state that are otherwise unable to meet minimum safe drinking water standards established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. The total amount of grants made pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000). The Legislative Analyst shall review the grant program and report to the Legislature not later than June 1, 1987.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision, the proceeds of any bonds authorized to be issued under the California Safe Drinking Water Bond Law of 1976 (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 13850)), that are unissued and uncommitted on the effective date of this chapter, shall be used for loans to suppliers in accordance with the terms, conditions, and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 434.   Effective September 29, 1996.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, and approved in Prop. 28 on Nov. 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13820.

(a) The department may make state grants to suppliers that are political subdivisions of the state, from moneys in the fund available for that purpose pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13819, to aid in the construction of projects that will enable the public agency to meet, at a minimum, safe drinking water standards established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. A grant may be made by the department only upon the specific approval of the Legislature, by an act enacted after the receipt of a report filed pursuant to Section 13822.

(b) Any contract for a grant entered into pursuant to this chapter may include provisions as agreed by the parties thereto, and the contract shall include, in substance, all of the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the project.

(2) An agreement by the department to grant to the public agency, during the progress of construction or following completion of construction as agreed by the parties, an amount that equals the portion of construction costs found by the department to be eligible for a state grant.

(3) An agreement by the public agency, (A) to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the project, (B) to commence operation of the project upon completion thereof, and to properly operate and maintain the project in accordance with the applicable provisions of law, (C) to apply for, and make reasonable efforts to secure, federal assistance for the project, (D) to secure approval of the department and of the State Department of Health Services before applying for federal assistance in order to maximize and best utilize the amounts of that assistance available, and (E) to provide for payment of the public agency’s share of the cost of the project, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 435.   Effective September 29, 1996.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, and approved in Prop. 28 on Nov. 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13821.

Applications for grants under this chapter shall be made to the department in the form and with the supporting material as prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13822.

The department shall prepare a report on each grant application pursuant to this chapter. The report shall be filed with the Legislature, if it is in session or, if it is not in session, with the Rules Committee of the Assembly and Senate. The department shall be authorized to make the grant only upon the specific approval of the grant by the Legislature, by an act enacted after the receipt of the report from the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13823.

(a) Loans and grants may be made only for projects for domestic water systems. The department may make reasonable allowance for future water supply needs and may provide for additional capacity when excessive costs would be incurred by later enlargement. The loans and grants may be made for all, or any part, of the cost of constructing, improving, or rehabilitating any system when, in the judgment of the State Department of Health Services, improvement or rehabilitation is necessary to provide pure, wholesome, and potable water in adequate quantity at sufficient pressure for health, cleanliness, and other domestic purposes. No single public agency shall receive grants pursuant to this chapter totaling more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000). Loans may be made to provide for the purchase of a water system or the purchase of watershed lands. No loan to an individual supplier shall exceed the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000), unless the Legislature by an act raises the limit specified in this section.

(b) Upon receipt of an application for a grant or loan pursuant to this chapter, the department shall propose to the applicant improvements to the applicant’s water development, distribution, and utilization system which will conserve water in a cost-effective manner. These improvements may include, but need not be limited to, leak detection and repair programs, valve repair and replacement, meter calibration and replacement, physical improvements to achieve corrosion control, distribution and installation of water conservation devices and fixtures, and other capital improvements which can be demonstrated to conserve water in a cost-effective manner. The department and applicant may agree to include these capital improvements in the grant or loan. Failure by the applicant to include water conservation capital improvements in the grant or loan application shall not be sufficient cause for the department to refuse to make the grant or loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13824.

An application for a grant pursuant to this chapter shall not be approved by the department, unless the department determines that the public agency is otherwise unable to meet minimum safe drinking water standards established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

No grant shall be made by the department except upon approval by the State Department of Health Services of project plans submitted by the applicant and upon issuance to the public agency of a permit or amended permit as specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 436.   Effective September 29, 1996.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, and approved in Prop. 28 on Nov. 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

13825.

First priority for grants shall be granted to public agencies having immediate health related problems, as certified by the State Department of Health Services. Additional high priority shall be granted to projects to correct immediate problems, as opposed to grants for construction of projects to meet future growth needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13826.

First priority for loans shall be given to suppliers with the most critical public health problems. Priority for loans shall also be given to suppliers which have a lesser capability to reasonably finance system improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13827.

Preliminary design work, including a cost estimate for the project, shall be completed before a loan or grant is awarded. Operation and maintenance costs shall be the responsibility of the supplier and may not be considered as part of the project cost. Costs for planning and preliminary engineering studies may be reimbursed following the receipt of a loan or grant subject to approval by the department and the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13828.

No application for a grant may be made pursuant to this chapter unless the public agency has also applied for a loan pursuant to this chapter. A public agency shall be eligible for a grant only to the extent that the department finds that the agency is found unable to repay the full costs of a loan.

If the department has determined that the applicant is unable to repay the full costs of a loan, the applicant may also file for a grant. Upon receipt of a grant application, the department shall determine that portion of the full costs that the applicant is capable of repaying. Grant funds shall only be provided for that portion that the applicant is not capable of repaying.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13829.

Grant funds shall be expended by the public agency within three years of the making of the grant. No grant funds may be expended by the public agency unless the public agency is able to demonstrate to the department, within one year of the making of the grant, supported by an acceptable bid, that the amount to be expended for the project will be within 20 percent of the public agency’s cost estimate for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13830.

For the purpose of administering of this chapter, the total expenditures of the department and the State Department of Health Services may not exceed 4 percent of the total amount of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter. The department shall establish a reasonable schedule of administrative fees for loans, which fees shall be paid by the supplier pursuant to Section 13819, to reimburse the state for the costs of state administration of this chapter.

Charges incurred by the Attorney General in protecting the state’s interests in the use and repayment of grant and loan funds under this chapter, and under the California Safe Drinking Water Bond Law of 1976 (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 13850)), shall be paid from the proceeds of bond sales under this chapter. These charges shall not be paid be from the 4 percent allocated for administrative purposes, but shall be treated as a program expense not to exceed 1.5 percent of the total amount of the bonds authorized to be sold under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13831.

As much of the moneys in the fund as may be necessary shall be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13832.

Repayment of all or part of the principal, which is the loan plus the administrative fee, may be deferred during a development period not exceeding 10 years within the maximum 50-year repayment period, when, in the department’s judgment, the development period is justified under the circumstances. Interest on the principal shall not be deferred. Repayment of principal which is deferred during a development period may, at the option of the supplier, be paid in annual installments during the remainder of the loan repayment period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 28 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13833.
